Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 4 Public Officials’ Conduct and Lobbyist Disclosure

Law reviews.

For article, “Lobbying in the Shadows:
Religious Interest Groups in the Legislative Process,” see 64 Emory L.J. 1041 (2015).

21-5-70.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Expenditure”:

Means a purchase, payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or conveyance of money or anything of value made for the purpose of influencing the actions of any public officer, specifically including any such transaction which is made on behalf of or for the benefit of a public employee for the purpose of influencing a public officer;

Includes any other form of payment when such can be reasonably construed as designed to encourage or influence a public officer;

(B.1)

Includes reimbursement or payment of expenses exceeding $75.00 provided to a public officer from any individual lobbyist for transportation, travel, lodging, registration, food, and beverages;

Includes any gratuitous transfer, payment, subscription, advance, or deposit of money, services, tickets for admission to athletic, sporting, recreational, musical concert, or other entertainment events, or anything of value, unless consideration of equal or greater than face value is received;

Includes reimbursement or payment of expenses for recreational or leisure activities; and

Does not include anything defined in paragraph (4.1) of this Code section as a lobbying expenditure, the provisions of subparagraphs (A) through (D) of this paragraph notwithstanding.

“Filed” means the delivery to the commission, as specified in this article, of a document that satisfies the requirements of this article. A document is considered delivered when it is electronically delivered to the commission or placed in the United States mail within the required filing time, properly addressed to the commission, as specified in this article, with adequate postage affixed.

“Identifiable group of public officers” means a description that is specifically determinable by available public records.

“Lobbying” means the activity of a lobbyist while acting in that capacity.

(4.1)

“Lobbying expenditure” means:

Promotional items generally distributed to the general public or to public officers and food and beverages produced in Georgia;

An award, plaque, certificate, memento, or similar item given in recognition of the recipient’s civic, charitable, political, professional, or public service;

Discounts, upgrades, memberships, or other accommodations extended by a business to a bona fide customer; or legitimate salary, benefits, fees, commissions, or expenses associated with a recipient’s nonpublic business, employment, trade, or profession;

Food, beverages, and registration at group events to which all members of an agency, as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 21-5-30.2, are invited. For purposes of this subparagraph, an agency shall also include the House of Representatives, the Senate, standing committees of such bodies but not for more than one of such group events per committee per calendar year, caucuses of members of the majority or minority political parties of the House or Senate, other caucuses of the House or Senate as approved by the House Committee on Ethics or the Senate Ethics Committee, and the governing body of each political subdivision of this state;

Campaign contributions or expenditures as defined by Code Section 21-5-3 and reported as required by Article 2 of this chapter;

Reimbursement or payment of actual and reasonable expenses provided to a public officer and his or her necessary public employee staff members for such public officer’s and staff members’ individual transportation, lodging, travel, and registration for attending educational, informational, charitable, or civic meetings or conferences that are held at locations within the United States and directly relate to the official duties of that public officer or the office of that public officer, plus food and beverages for such public officer, his or her necessary public employee staff members, and spouse while attending such educational, informational, charitable, or civic meetings or conferences;

Anything which:

Does not qualify as a lobbying expenditure under subparagraphs (A) through (F) of this paragraph; and

Would qualify as an expenditure under subparagraph (B.1) of paragraph (1) of this Code section except that it does not exceed an amount or value of $75.00 per person.

“Lobbyist” means:

Any natural person who, either individually or as an employee of another person, receives or anticipates receiving more than $250.00 per calendar year in compensation or reimbursement or payment of expenses specifically for undertaking to promote or oppose the passage of any legislation by the General Assembly, or any committee of either chamber or a joint committee thereof, or the approval or veto of legislation by the Governor;

Any natural person who makes a lobbying expenditure of more than $1,000.00 in a calendar year, not including the person’s own travel, food, lodging expenses, or informational material, to promote or oppose the passage of any legislation by the General Assembly, or any committee of either chamber or a joint committee thereof, or the approval or veto of legislation by the Governor;

Reserved;

Any natural person who, either individually or as an employee of another person, is compensated specifically for undertaking to promote or oppose the passage of any ordinance or resolution by a public officer specified under subparagraph (F) or (G) of paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3, or any committee of such public officers, or the approval or veto of any such ordinance or resolution;

Any natural person who makes a lobbying expenditure of more than $1,000.00 in a calendar year, not including the person’s own travel, food, lodging expenses, or informational material, to promote or oppose the passage of any ordinance or resolution by a public officer specified under subparagraph (F) or (G) of paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3, or any committee of such public officers, or the approval or veto of any such ordinance or resolution;

Any natural person who as an employee of local government engages in any activity covered under subparagraph (D) of this paragraph;

Any natural person who, for compensation, either individually or as an employee of another person, is hired specifically to undertake influencing a public officer or state agency in the selection of a vendor to supply any goods or services to any state agency but does not include any employee or independent contractor of the vendor solely on the basis that such employee or independent contractor participates in soliciting a bid or in preparing a written bid, written proposal, or other document relating to a potential sale to a state agency and shall not include a bona fide salesperson who sells to or contracts with a state agency for goods or services and who does not otherwise engage in activities described in subparagraphs (A) through (F) or (H) through (I) of this paragraph;

Any natural person who, either individually or as an employee of another person, is compensated specifically for undertaking to promote or oppose the passage of any rule or regulation of any state agency;

Any natural person who, either individually or as an employee of another person, is compensated specifically for undertaking to promote or oppose any matter before the State Transportation Board; or

Any natural person who makes a lobbying expenditure of more than $1,000.00 in a calendar year, not including the person’s own travel, food, lodging expenses, or informational material, to promote or oppose any matter before the State Transportation Board.

“Public officer” means a member of the State Transportation Board and those public officers specified under paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3, except as otherwise provided in this article and also includes any public officer or employee who has any discretionary authority over, or is a member of a public body which has any discretionary authority over, the selection of a vendor to supply any goods or services to any state agency.

“State agency” means any branch of state government or any agency, authority, department, board, bureau, commission, council, corporation, entity, or instrumentality of this state or of a local political subdivision of this state.

“Vendor” means any person who sells to or contracts with any state agency for the provision of any goods or services.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 16; Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 13; Ga. L. 1994, p. 277, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 20/HB 48; Ga. L. 2008, p. 261, § 1/SB 456; Ga. L. 2009, p. 41, § 1/SB 47; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 20/SB 17; Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 7/HB 232; Ga. L. 2011, p. 569, § 3/SB 160; Ga. L. 2013, p. 540, § 2/HB 142; Ga. L. 2016, p. 173, §§ 9, 10/SB 199.

Cross references.

Prohibition against contributions by corporations for purpose of influencing vote, judgment, or action of officer of state, §

14-5-6

.

Bribery of state officials, §

16-10-2

.

Criminal penalty for action by public officer or employee who asks for or receives thing of value in return for agreement to seek passage or defeat of legislation, §§

16-10-4

,

16-10-5

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 10/HB 232, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval. It is the express intention of the General Assembly that this Act be applied retroactively to January 10, 2011, as well as prospectively.” This Act became effective March 15, 2011.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Vendor relationships, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health Administration, Chapter 111-1-2.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the weaknesses in Georgia statutes prohibiting lobbying, and the effect of such law on lawyers, see 5 Mercer L. Rev. 311 (1954).

For article on the 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

For article on the 2013 amendment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 129 (2013).

For note on the 1994 amendment of this Code section, see 11 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 193 (1994).

21-5-71.
Registration required; application for registration; supplemental registration; expiration; docket; fees; identification cards; public rosters; exemptions.

Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection and except as otherwise provided by subsection (i) of this Code section, no person shall engage in lobbying as defined by this article unless such person is registered with the commission as a lobbyist. The commission shall not allow a person who has been convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude in the courts of this state or an offense that, had it occurred in this state, would constitute a felony involving moral turpitude under the laws of this state to become a registered lobbyist unless ten years or more have elapsed since the completion of the person’s sentence. The administration of this article is vested in the commission.

When a person is hired or retained as an employee or agent or independent contractor and under the agreement of the parties the primary duties, or a substantial part of the duties, of the person will involve lobbying activities, the person shall register as a lobbyist before commencing lobbying activities.

Each lobbyist who is required to register under this article shall file an application for registration with the commission. The application shall be verified by the applicant and shall contain:

The applicant’s name, address, and telephone number;

The name, address, and telephone number of the person or agency that employs, appoints, or authorizes the applicant to lobby on its behalf;

A statement of the general business or purpose of each person, firm, corporation, association, or agency the applicant represents;

If the applicant represents a membership group other than an agency or corporation, the general purpose and approximate number of members of the organization;

A statement signed by the person or agency employing, appointing, or authorizing the applicant to lobby on its behalf;

If the applicant is a lobbyist attempting to influence rule making or purchasing by a state agency or agencies, the name of the state agency or agencies before which the applicant engages in lobbying;

A statement disclosing each individual or entity on whose behalf the applicant is registering if such individual or entity has agreed to pay him or her an amount exceeding $10,000.00 in a calendar year for lobbying activities;

A statement verifying that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude in the courts of this state or an offense that, had it occurred in this state, would constitute a felony involving moral turpitude under the laws of this state or, if the applicant has been so convicted, a statement identifying such conviction, the date thereof, a copy of the person’s sentence, and a statement that more than ten years have elapsed since the completion of his or her sentence; and

A statement by the applicant verifying that the applicant has received the Georgia General Assembly Employee Sexual Harassment Policy as set forth in the Georgia General Assembly Handbook, has read and understands the policy, and agrees to abide by the policy.

The commission shall retain on file the statement required pursuant to paragraph (9) of this subsection and any renewal statements under subsection (d) of this Code section for the duration of the lobbyist’s registration period. A copy of such statement shall be sent to the Legislative Fiscal Office.

The lobbyist shall, prior to any substantial or material change or addition in their registration, file a supplemental registration indicating such substantial or material change or addition to the registration prior to its expiration. Previously filed information may be incorporated by reference. Substantial or material changes or additions shall include, but are not limited to, the pertinent information concerning changes or additions to client and employment information required by paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (6), and (7) and conviction status required by paragraph (8) of subsection (b) of this Code section.

Each registration under this Code section shall expire on December 31 of each year. The commission may establish renewal procedures for those applicants desiring continuous registrations. Previously filed information may be incorporated by reference; provided, however, that the statement regarding the sexual harassment policy required under paragraph (9) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be signed and filed each year as a part of the renewal process.

The commission shall provide a suitable public docket for registration under this Code section with appropriate indices and shall enter promptly therein the names of the lobbyists and the organizations they represent.

Each person registering under this Code section shall pay the registration fees set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection; provided, however, that a person who represents any state, county, municipal, or public agency, department, commission, or authority shall be exempted from payment of such registration fees.

There shall be no charge for annual lobbyist registration or renewal filed pursuant to this Code section; provided, however, that the commission shall set, collect, and retain the fees for the following items:

Lobbyist identification card issued pursuant to this Code section;

Lobbyist supplemental registration filed pursuant to this Code section; and

Each replacement of a lobbyist identification card issued pursuant to this Code section.

For reports filed when the General Assembly is not in session, in addition to other penalties provided under this chapter, a late fee of $275.00 shall be imposed for each report that is filed late. In addition, a late fee of $1,000.00 shall be imposed on the fifteenth day after the due date for such report if the report has not been filed. A late fee of $10,000.00 shall be imposed on the forty-fifth day after the due date for such report if the report has not been filed.

The commission shall retain $25.00 of the first late fee received for processing pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 45-12-92.1.

For reports filed when the General Assembly is in session, in addition to other penalties provided under this chapter, a late fee of $275.00 shall be imposed for each report that is filed late. In addition, a late fee of $1,000.00 shall be imposed on the seventh day after the due date for such report if the report has not been filed. A late fee of $10,000.00 shall be imposed on the twenty-first day after the due date for such report if the report has not been filed.

The commission shall retain $25.00 of the first late fee received for processing pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 45-12-92.1.

As soon as practicable after registering any such person, the commission shall issue to such person an identification card which shall have printed thereon the name of the lobbyist, a color photograph of the lobbyist, and the person or agency such lobbyist represents, provided that, when any such person represents more than one entity, such identification card shall have printed thereon the name of the registered person and the word “LOBBYIST.” Each lobbyist while engaged in lobbying at the capitol or in a government facility shall display said identification in a readily visible manner.

The commission shall regularly publish in print or electronically public rosters of lobbyists along with the respective persons, firms, corporations, associations, agencies, or governmental entities they represent. During sessions of the General Assembly, the commission shall weekly report to the Clerk of the House of Representatives, the Secretary of the Senate, and the Governor those persons who have registered as lobbyists since the convening of the General Assembly. The commission shall be authorized to charge a reasonable fee for providing copies of the roster to the public.

The registration provisions of this Code section shall not apply to:

Any individual who communicates personal views, interests, or professional opinions on that individual’s own behalf to any public officer;

(1.1)

An employee or independent contractor of a vendor who solely participates in soliciting a bid or in preparing a written bid, written proposal, or other document relating to a potential contract with a state or local government agency or a bona fide salesperson who sells to or contracts with a state or local government agency for goods or services, is not hired specifically to undertake influencing a public officer or state agency in the selection of a vendor to supply any goods or services to any state agency, and does not engage in other activities which would make such person a lobbyist;

Any person who is invited by a public agency or governmental entity to appear before a committee or at a hearing of such agency or entity, including but not limited to a committee of either chamber of the General Assembly or a joint committee thereof, for the purpose of giving testimony so long as such person clearly identifies himself or herself and the interested party on whose behalf he or she is testifying;

Any person who is invited to furnish information upon the specific request of a public agency or governmental entity, including but not limited to a committee of either chamber of the General Assembly or a joint committee thereof, so long as such person clearly identifies himself or herself and the interested party on whose behalf he or she furnishes such information;

(3.1)

Any individual who is not compensated for the specific purpose of lobbying, does not incur more than $250.00 per calendar year in reimbursable lobbying expenditures, and is a member, director, trustee, officer, or committee member of a business, trade, labor, farm, professional, religious, educational, or charitable association, foundation, or organization which employs or contracts with a registered lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying;

Any licensed attorney appearing on behalf of or representing a client, and any staff employed by such attorney, when such attorney is not compensated for the specific purpose of lobbying;

Any person employed or appointed by a lobbyist registered pursuant to this Code section whose duties and activities do not include lobbying;

Elected public officers or appointed public officials performing the official duties of their public office or position;

(6.1)

Any employee of the executive or judicial branch of state government; provided, however, that when such an employee is acting on behalf of such government employer, meeting with or appearing before a public officer other than one from the same branch of government which employs such employee, and engaged in activity for which registration would otherwise be required under this Code section, such employee shall be required to display an identification card, issued by such employer, which shall have printed thereon the employee’s name and the name of the employer; or

Any public employee, aide, or intern who performs services at the direction of a member of the General Assembly including, but not limited to, drafting petitions, bills, or resolutions; attending the taking of testimony; collating facts; preparing arguments and memorials and submitting them orally or in writing to a committee or member of the General Assembly; and other services of like character intended to reach the reason of the legislators.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 16; Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 14; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 21/HB 48; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-49/HB 1055; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 21/SB 17; Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 8/HB 232; Ga. L. 2013, p. 540, § 5/HB 142; Ga. L. 2016, p. 173, § 11/SB 199; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 21/HB 323; Ga. L. 2018, p. 994, § 1/HB 973; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 13/SB 120.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, added “or” at the end of paragraph (i)(6.1).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (b)(7); added “; and” at the end of paragraph (b)(8); added paragraph (b)(9); and added the proviso at the end of subsection (d).

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022, inserted “in their registration” in the first sentence in subsection (c).

Code Commission notes.

The amendments to subparagraphs (f)(2)(D) and (f)(2)(E) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-49, irreconcilably conflicted with and were treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 21.
See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921); Keener v. McDougall,

232 Ga. 273

(1974).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 304/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on January 10, 2011, and shall apply to all reports filed on and after such date; provided, however, that if Code Section 45-12-92.1 as enacted by HB 1055 at the regular session of the 2010 General Assembly does not become law, then the following provisions as enacted by this Act shall not become effective and shall be reserved instead: paragraph (2) of subsection (k) of Code Section 21-5-34; paragraph (2) of subsection (f) of Code Section 21-5-50; division (f)(2)(D)(ii) of Code Section 21-5-71; and division (f)(2)(E)(ii) of Code Section 21-5-71.” HB 1055 became effective May 12, 2010.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 10/HB 232, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval. It is the express intention of the General Assembly that this Act be applied retroactively to January 10, 2011, as well as prospectively.” This Act became effective March 15, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

For article on the 2013 amendment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 129 (2013).

21-5-72.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of registration; reinstatement; civil penalty.

In addition to other penalties provided in this article, the commission may by order deny, suspend, or revoke for a period not to exceed one year the registration of a lobbyist if it finds that the lobbyist:

Has filed an application for registration with the commission which was incomplete in a material respect or contained a statement that was, in light of the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to a material fact;

Has willfully violated or willfully failed to comply with this article or a rule promulgated by the commission under this article;

Has failed to comply with the reporting requirements of this article; or

Has engaged in lobbying practices in violation of this article.

Application may be made to the commission for reinstatement. Such reinstatement shall be conducted in the same manner as required for an initial registration under this article and shall be conditioned upon payment of the same registration fees applicable to an initial registration and also any outstanding penalty fees.

Any person failing to comply with or violating any of the provisions of this article shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $2,000.00 per violation.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 16.

21-5-72.1.
Regulation of certain contact between lobbyists and members of the General Assembly; making or acceptance of certain expenditures.

No person who is required by the law of this state to register as a lobbyist shall meet at the state capitol, Coverdell Legislative Office Building, or other state government facility with any member of the General Assembly to discuss the promotion or opposition of the passage of any legislation by the General Assembly, or any committee of either chamber or a joint committee thereof, or the override of a veto unless such person either is wearing his or her valid official registered lobbyist badge or is a resident of the House or Senate district which such member represents.

No person who is registered as a lobbyist under Code Section 21-5-71 shall make any expenditure.

No public officer shall with actual knowledge accept any expenditure from a person who is registered as a lobbyist under Code Section 21-5-71.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-72.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 540, § 6/HB 142.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 enactment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 129 (2013).

21-5-73.
Disclosure reports.

Each lobbyist registered under this article shall file disclosure reports as provided for in this Code section in the electronic format specified by the commission.

A person who is required to register under this article and lobbies to promote or oppose the passage of any legislation by the General Assembly, or any committee of either chamber or a joint committee thereof, or the approval or veto of legislation by the Governor shall file a semimonthly disclosure report on the first and fifteenth day of each month, current through the end of the preceding report, beginning January 15 and continuing throughout the period that the General Assembly is in session.

A person who is required to register under this article and lobbies to promote or oppose the passage of any ordinance or resolution by a public officer specified under subparagraph (F) or (G) of paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3, or any committee of such public officers, or the approval or veto of any such ordinance or resolution shall:

File a disclosure report, current through the end of the preceding month, on or before the fifth day of May, September, and January of each year instead of the reports required by subsections (b) and (d) of this Code section; and

File such report with the commission, file a copy of such report with the election superintendent of each county involved if the report contains any lobbying expenditures relating to county or county school district affairs, and file a copy of such report with the municipal clerk (or if there is no municipal clerk, with the chief executive officer of the municipality) of each municipality involved if the report contains any lobbying expenditures relating to municipal affairs or independent school district affairs.

A person who is required to register under this article and:

Lobbies to promote or oppose the passage of any legislation by the General Assembly, or any committee of either chamber or a joint committee thereof, or the approval or veto of legislation by the Governor;

As an employee of the executive branch or judicial branch of local government, lobbies to promote or oppose the passage of any ordinance or resolution by a public officer specified under subparagraph (F) or (G) of paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3, or any committee of such public officers, or the approval or veto of any such ordinance or resolution;

Lobbies to influence a public officer or state agency in the selection of a vendor to supply any goods or services to any state agency; or

Lobbies to promote or oppose any matter before the State Transportation Board

shall file a monthly disclosure report, current through the end of the preceding period, on or before the fifth day of each month; provided, however, that such monthly reports shall not be filed during any period that the lobbyist files a semimonthly report pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

Reports filed by lobbyists shall be verified and shall include:

A description of all lobbying expenditures described in subparagraphs (D), (F), and (G) of paragraph (4.1) of Code Section 21-5-70, or the value thereof made on behalf of or for the benefit of a public officer or on behalf of or for the benefit of a public employee for the purpose of influencing a public officer by the lobbyist or employees of the lobbyist or by any person on whose behalf the lobbyist is registered if the lobbyist has actual knowledge of such lobbying expenditure. The description of each reported lobbying expenditure shall include:

The name and title of the public officer or public employee or, if the lobbying expenditure is simultaneously incurred for an identifiable group of public officers or public employees the individual identification of whom would be impractical, a general description of that identifiable group;

The amount, date, and description of the lobbying expenditure and a summary of all spending classified by category. Such categories shall include meals, lodging, travel, and tickets;

The aggregate lobbying expenditures described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4.1) of Code Section 21-5-70 incurred during the reporting period; provided, however, that expenses for travel and for food, beverage, and lodging in connection therewith afforded a public officer or public employee shall be reported in the same manner as under subparagraphs (A), (B), and (D) of this paragraph;

If applicable, the number of the bill, resolution, ordinance, or regulation pending before the governmental entity in support of or opposition to which the lobbying expenditure was made; and

If applicable, the rule or regulation number or description of the rule or regulation pending before the state agency in support of or opposition to which the lobbying expenditure was made;

(1.1)

In any case where lobbying expenditures are reported pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection for an identifiable group not listed in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4.1) of Code Section 21-5-70, the lobbyist shall certify on the disclosure report that no lobbying expenditure made on behalf of or for the benefit of any individual public officer exceeded $75.00;

For those who are required to register under this article and lobby to influence a public officer or state agency in the selection of a vendor to supply any goods or services to any state agency, the name of any vendor or vendors for which the lobbyist undertook to influence the awarding of a contract or contracts by any state agency together with a description of the contract or contracts and the monetary amount of the contract or contracts; and

For those who are required to register under this article and lobby to promote or oppose the passage of any rule or regulation of any state agency, the name of the individual or entity for which the lobbyist undertook to influence the rule or regulation of a state agency.

The reports required by this article shall be in addition to any reports required under Code Section 45-1-6, relating to required reports by state vendors of gifts to public employees. Compliance with this Code section shall not excuse noncompliance with that Code section, and compliance with that Code section shall not excuse noncompliance with this Code section, notwithstanding the fact that in some cases the same information may be required to be disclosed under both Code sections.

The electronic filing of any disclosure report required by this article shall constitute an affirmation that such report is true, complete, and correct.

Reserved.

All lobbyists shall have a grace period of three business days in filing all disclosure reports.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 16; Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, §§ 15, 16; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 22/HB 48; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 22/SB 17; Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 9/HB 232; Ga. L. 2011, p. 569, § 4/SB 160; Ga. L. 2013, p. 540, § 7/HB 142; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 21/SB 52.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, in paragraph (e)(1.1), substituted “this subsection” for “this Code section” and “subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4.1)” for “subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1)”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2013, a semicolon was substituted for the period at the end of paragraph (e)(1.1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘ Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 10/HB 232, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval. It is the express intention of the General Assembly that this Act be applied retroactively to January 10, 2011, as well as prospectively.” This Act became effective March 15, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

For article on the 2013 amendment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 129 (2013).

21-5-74.
Postemployment restrictions on lobbyists.

A lobbyist shall not be eligible for executive appointment to any board, authority, commission, or bureau created and established by the laws of this state which regulates the activities of a business, firm, corporation, or agency that the lobbyist represented until one year after the expiration of the lobbyist’s registration for that business, firm, corporation, or agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 23/HB 48.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 enactment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-75.
Postemployment restrictions on public officers.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, on and after January 8, 2007, persons identified in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3 and the executive director of each state board, commission, or authority shall be prohibited from registering as a lobbyist or engaging in lobbying under this article for a period of one year after terminating such employment or leaving such office.

The lobbying prohibition contained in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to persons who terminate such employment or leave such office but who remain employed in state government.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 23/HB 48.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 enactment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).